District of Columbia statutes.
10-503.15

Removal or injury of property forbidden.

It is forbidden to step or climb upon, remove, or in any way injure any statue, seat, wall, fountain, or other erection or architectural feature, or any tree, shrub, plant, or turf in said United States Capitol Grounds.

July 31, 1946, 60 Stat. 718, ch. 707, § 5
This section is referenced in § 10-503.18.
1981 Ed., § 9-111.
1973 Ed., § 9-122.